District of Columbia statutes.
4-203.02

Assignment to public institution by Department.

No child 6 years of age or younger shall be assigned by the Department to any public institution, except that any such child who requires medical treatment may be assigned to a hospital or other medical facility for such treatment; provided, that medical treatment shall not be construed to include emotional disorders of less than an acute nature. In furtherance thereof, the Mayor shall develop an overall plan of child care and emergency child care so as to eliminate the necessity of a public institution for the care of such children other than for medical reasons. No child shall remain in any crisis facility for longer than 15 days.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 302, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-203.2.